en: Baba ghanoush
de: Baba Ghanoush
es: Baba ganush, Baba ghanush, Baba ganuch
fr: Baba ganousch, Baba Ghanouge
hr: Baba ghanoush
nl: Baba ghanoush, Baba ganush

en: Sweet potato spreads
de: Süßkartoffel-Aufstriche, Süßkartoffel-Aufstrich
fr: Tartinades de patates douces
hr: Namazi od batata

en: Lentil spreads, Lentil dips
de: Linsen-Aufstriche, Linsen-Aufstrich
fr: Tartinades de lentilles, houmous de lentilles
hr: Namazi od leće

en: Bean spreads, bean dips
fr: Tartinades de haricots, Houmous de haricots
hr: Namazi od graha
nl: Bonenspreads

en: Hummus, Houmous
xx: hummus
ar: حمص بطحينة
az: humus
be: хумус
bg: Хумус
bn: হুম্মুস
br: houmous
cy: hwmws
de: Hummus
el: χούμους
eo: kikerkaĉo
fa: حمص
fr: Houmous, hommos, hoummous, houmos, oumos, humus, hummus
he: חומוס
hi: हुम्मुस
hu: hummusz
hy: հումուս
it: Hummus
ja: フムス
ka: ჰუმუსი
kn: ಹುಮುಸ್
ko: 훔무스
ku: humûs
lt: humusas
mk: хумус
ml: ഹമ്മൂസ്
ne: हम्मस
pa: ਹੰਮਸ
pl: Hummus, Hummusy
ro: hummus, humus
ru: Хуммус
sr: хумус
th: ฮัมมัส
tl: humus
tr: humus
uk: хумус
ur: حمص
zh: 鹰嘴豆泥

en: Classic hummus, traditional hummus
fr: Houmous classiques, Houmous natures
sv: Original hummus, Hummus original

en: Red pepper hummus
fr: Houmous aux poivrons

en: Hummus mixes
sv: Hummus mix

en: Ktipiti, tirokafteri
fr: Ktipiti

en: Muhammara
es: Muhammara
fr: Muhammara
hr: Muhammara
nl: Muhammara

en: Bruschetta spreads
fr: Tartinades type bruschetta

en: Tomato bruschetta spreads
de: Tomaten-Bruschetta Aufstriche
fr: Bruschetta de tomates
hr: Namazi od brusketa od rajčice

en: Onion chutneys
de: Zwiebelchutneys
es: Cebolla caramelizada, Cebolla confitada
fr: Confits d'oignons, Chutneys d'oignons
hr: Chutneys od luka
it: Chutney di cipolle
nl: Uienchutney

en: Tomato chutneys
fr: Confits de tomates

en: Sweet pepper chutneys
fr: Confits de poivrons

en: Vegetarian pâtés
da: Vegetariske postejer
de: Vegetarische Pasteten
pl: Pasztety wegetariańskie
sv: Vegetarianska pastejer, Vegetariska pastejer

en: Plant-based pâtés, Vegan pâtés
ca: Patés vegetals
da: Plantebaserede postejer, Veganske postejer
de: Pflanzlische Pasteten
es: Patés vegetales
fi: Kasvipateet
fr: Pâtés végétaux, Pâté végétal
hr: Paštete na biljnoj bazi
it: Paté a base vegetale
nl: Plantaardige smeerworsten, Plantaardige pastas
pl: Pasztety roślinne
ro: Pate vegetal
sv: Växtbaserade pastejer, Veganska pastejer

en: Vegetarian olive pâtés
es: Patés vegetales a base de aceitunas, Patés vegetales de aceitunas
fr: Pâtés à tartiner végétaux à base d'olives, Pâtés à tartiner végétales à base de olives
hr: Vegetarijanske paštete od maslina
nl: Plantaardige pastas op basis van olijfolie

en: Vegetarian tofu pâtés
es: Patés vegetales a base de tofu
fr: Pâtés à tartiner végétaux à base de tofu, Pâtés à tartiner végétales à base de tofu
hr: Vegetarijanske paštete od tofua
nl: Plantaardige pastas op basis van tofu
pl: Pasztety roślinne z tofu

en: Pumpkin seeds and their products, Squash seeds and their products
bg: Тиквени семки и продукти от тях
de: Kürbiskerne und deren Produkte
es: Semillas de calabaza y derivados
fi: kurpitsan siemenet ja siementuotteet
fr: Graines de courge et dérivés
hr: Sjemenke bundeve i njihovi proizvodi
it: Semi di zucca e derivati
nl: Pompoenzaden en afgeleiden
pl: Pestki dyni i ich produkty